District of Columbia statutes.
50-706

Citizen right of action.

Any person aggrieved by the failure of an owner or operator of a commercial fleet to comply with this chapter may sue for relief in any court of competent jurisdiction. The court may grant whatever declaratory or injunctive relief it deems appropriate. Reasonable attorney’s fees and court costs may be awarded to the prevailing party, other than the District government, for actions brought under this section.

History

Mar. 8, 1991, D.C. Law 8-243, § 7, 38 DCR 355

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-2006.